Maine, session 132, LD1794.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 239 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 239
ENFORCEMENT OF PARKING VIOLATIONS ON LOTS ACCESSIBLE TO
THE PUBLIC
§1500-Z. Enforcement of parking violations on property accessible to the public
A person or entity that owns, operates or manages property accessible to the public for
the parking of motor vehicles, or that provides collection or enforcement services with
respect to the parking of motor vehicles, may not impose, assess or seek to enforce or
collect any fine, fee or charge to any person for the violation of any parking rule applicable
to that property except in compliance with this section.
1. Fine, fee or charge amount must be reasonable and conspicuously posted. The
amount of any fine, fee or charge to any person for the violation of any parking rule
applicable to property accessible to the public for the parking of motor vehicles must be
reasonable and must be conspicuously and prominently posted within the property so that
it is visible at any entrance and exit of a parking lot or parking structure within the property
by a person entering and exiting in a motor vehicle.
2. Written notice of violation required. Written notice of a violation of any parking
rule applicable to property accessible to the public for the parking of motor vehicles,
including the failure to pay an amount of money to park a motor vehicle, must be provided
to the registered owner of the motor vehicle. At a minimum, the written notice must include
the following information:
A. The date and time of the violation;
B. The nature of the violation, including the parking rule violated;
Page 1 - 132LR1506(03)

C. The amount of the fine, fee or charge for the violation and the payment due date for
the fine, fee or charge for the violation, which must be at least 10 business days after
the date of the written notice of the violation;
D. Payment instructions; and
E. Contact information for the person or entity responsible for collecting the fine, fee
or charge for the violation.
3. Use of automated license plate recognition system prohibited. The provisions of
Title 29-A, section 2117-A prohibit the use of an automated license plate recognition
system at a property accessible to the public for the parking of motor vehicles, subject to
the exceptions enumerated in that section.
4. Violation; remedies. A violation of this section is a violation of the Maine Unfair
Trade Practices Act. In addition to any remedies available under the Maine Unfair Trade
Practices Act, a claimant may obtain an award of damages equal to 3 times the amount of
a fine, fee or charge assessed, imposed or sought to be enforced in violation of this section.
Page 2 - 132LR1506(03)